02_Morphology/ru.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

! Tags

! lexical categories

%<n%>                ! Noun


! genders (plural is pretty much a gender in Russian I think)

%<pl%>               ! Plural
%<ma%>		     ! masculine
%<fe%>		     ! feminine
%<ne%>		     ! neuter

! cases

%<nom%>		     ! nominative
%<acc%>		     ! accusitive


! Archiphonemes

! %{Ma%}		     ! Masculine Archiphoneme variable
! %{Fe%}		     ! Female Archiphoneme variable
! %{Ne%}		     ! Neuter Archiphoneme variable
! need this one for nouns
%{Pl%}		     ! Plural Archiphoneme placeholder

%{Nom%}		     ! Nominative Archiphoneme variable
%{Acc%}		     ! Accusitive Archiphoneme variable


%>                   ! Morpheme boundary

LEXICON Root

Nouns ; 

LEXICON CASE

! Nominative
%<nom%>:%{Nom%} # ;

! Accusitive
%<acc%>:%{Acc%} # ;


LEXICON PLURAL

		# ; 
%<pl%>:%{Pl%}	# ;

LEXICON N 

%<n%>: PLURAL CASE ;

LEXICON Nouns

город:город %<ma%> N ;			! "city"
фильм:фильм %<ma%> N ;		  	! "movie"
гриб:гриб %<ma%> N ; 		  	! "mushroom"
холодильник:холодильник %<ma%> N ; 	! "refrigerator"
